Maryland, session 2026, SB0714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(I–1) “MOBILE FOOD SERVICE FACILITY” MEANS A FOOD SERVICE FACILITY
WHICH IS A MECHANICALLY, ELECTRICALLY, MANUALLY, OR OTHERWISE
PROPELLED VEHICLE OPERATING ON LAND OR WATER.
(j–2) (1) “Semipermanent food service facility” means a food service facility that:
– 1 –

Ch. 350 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Is built at a location other than where it operates;
(ii) Is transported as a complete unit that does not require a building
permit to install on the location at which it operates;
(iii) Has no indoor seating for patrons; and
(iv) When serving cooked food, serves only foods cooked for
immediate service.
(2) “Semipermanent food service facility” does not include a food service
facility that is a mechanically, electrically, manually, or otherwise propelled vehicle
operating on land or water that moves as part of its routine operation to:
(i) Change location for sales;
(ii) Obtain food and other supplies;
(iii) Fill potable water supply holding tanks;
(iv) Empty wastewater holding tanks; or
(v) Provide for the cleaning and sanitation of equipment and
utensils.
21–309.
(a) (1) In this section the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(2) [“Mobile food service facility” means a food service facility which is a
mechanically, electrically, manually, or otherwise propelled vehicle operating on land or
water.
(3)] “On–farm food service facility” means a food service facility that:
(i) Is located on a farm;
(ii) Serves food as designated by the Department; and
(iii) Operates during a period of time of not more than 30 consecutive
days with up to two renewals in a 1–year period.
[(4)] (3) “Temporary food service facility” means a food service facility
which operates during a period of time of not more than 30 consecutive days at a fixed
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 350
location in conjunction with a fair, carnival, public exhibition, construction project,
recreational facility, or similar gathering.
21–325.
(a) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, each food establishment shall have:
(1) A convenient toilet that is:
(i) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, separated
from any room in which food is manufactured, prepared, packed, canned, frozen, sold, or
distributed;
(ii) Kept in a sanitary condition; and
(iii) Properly ventilated; and
(2) A convenient lavatory that is:
(i) Supplied with soap, water, towels, or other approved hand drying
devices;
(ii) Kept in a sanitary condition; and
(iii) Properly ventilated.
(b) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MOBILE FOOD SERVICE
FACILITY OR A SEMIPERMANENT FOOD SERVICE FACILITY LOCATED IN
WASHINGTON COUNTY.
(2) Each food service facility which prepares food and provides seating for
patrons established after January 1, 1979, shall have available for the public:
[(1)] (I) A convenient toilet that is kept in a sanitary condition; and
[(2)] (II) A convenient lavatory that is:
[(i)] 1. Supplied with soap, water, towels, or other approved hand
drying devices;
[(ii)] 2. Kept in a sanitary condition; and
[(iii)] 3. Properly ventilated.
(c) A room that houses a toilet may be constructed within a larger room in which
food is manufactured, prepared, packed, canned, frozen, sold, or distributed.
– 3 –

Ch. 350 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (1) This subsection applies only to a food establishment that is:
(i) A business that conducts agritourism, as defined in § 4–212 of
the Land Use Article;
(ii) A Class 4 limited winery licensed under § 2–206 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article; and
(iii) A Class 8 farm brewery licensed under § 2–210 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article.
(2) A food establishment may comply with the requirement to provide a
convenient lavatory by providing a portable chemical toilet that:
(i) Otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (a)(2) or [(b)(2)]
(B)(2)(II) of this section; and
(ii) Is placed at least 25 feet from a well.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 4 –